Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-958
Department of Correctional Services Warehouse Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Department of Correctional Services Warehouse Revolving Fund. This fund shall only be used for the purchase of items to be resold at cost to facilities and programs within the Department of Correctional Services. Facilities and programs within the department receiving items from the central warehouse system shall be billed for such goods at the time of delivery. All receipts from the items sold through the central warehouse system shall be deposited in the fund. The fund shall be administered by the Director of Correctional Services. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1999, LB 873, § 9.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.